sk-SK: Rozhranie pre výstup špeciálnych efektov: 1/4 in spúšťač; 3,5 mm spúšťač; DMX (3-pinový XLR); DMX (5-pinový XLR); Proprietárny kábel/port; Spúšťač RCA; RJ45 (Art-Net/sACN); Zopnutie kontaktu relé; Svorkovnica/skrutkové svorky; USB; Iné
pl: Interfejs wyjściowy efektów specjalnych: Wyzwalacz 1/4 cala; Wyzwalacz 3,5 mm; DMX (3-pinowe złącze XLR); DMX (5-pinowe złącze XLR); Zastrzeżony kabel/port; Wyzwalacz RCA; RJ45 (Art-Net/sACN); Zestyk przekaźnikowy; Listwa zaciskowa / zaciski śrubowe; USB; Inne
fi: Erikoistehosteiden lähtöliitäntä: 1/4 tuuman heräte; 3,5 mm:n heräte; DMX (3-napainen XLR); DMX (5-napainen XLR); Valmistajakohtainen kaapeli/portti; RCA-heräte; RJ45 (Art-Net/sACN); Releen sulkeutuva kosketin; Riviliitin/ruuviliittimet; USB; Muu
pt-PT: Interface de saída de efeitos especiais: Acionador de 1/4 pol.; Acionador de 3,5 mm; DMX (XLR de 3 pinos); DMX (XLR de 5 pinos); Cabo/porta de propriedade; Acionador RCA; RJ45 (Art-Net/sACN); Fecho de contacto de relé; Bloco de terminais/terminais de parafuso; USB; Outro
sv: Utgångsgränssnitt för specialeffekter: 1/4-tums trigger; 3,5 mm trigger; DMX (3-stifts XLR); DMX (5-stifts XLR); Patentskyddad kabel/port; RCA-trigger; RJ45 (Art-Net/sACN); Reläslutning; Kopplingsplint/skruvplint; USB; Annat
it: Interfaccia di uscita per effetti speciali: Trigger da 1/4 in; Trigger da 3,5 mm; DMX (XLR a 3 pin); DMX (XLR a 5 pin); Cavo/porta proprietario; Trigger RCA; RJ45 (Art-Net/sACN); Chiusura contatto relè; Morsettiera/morsetti a vite; USB; Altro
lt-LT: Specialiųjų efektų išvesties sąsaja: 1/4 col. paleidiklis; 3,5 mm paleidiklis; DMX (3 kontaktų XLR); DMX (5 kontaktų XLR); Nuosavybinis kabelis / prievadas; RCA paleidiklis; RJ45 („Art-Net“ / sACN); Relės kontakto uždarymas; Gnybtų blokas / sraigtiniai gnybtai; USB; Kita
ko: 특수 효과 출력 인터페이스: 1/4인치 트리거; 3.5mm 트리거; DMX(3핀 XLR); DMX(5핀 XLR); 독점 케이블/포트; RCA 트리거; RJ45(Art-Net/sACN); 릴레이 접점 폐쇄; 단자대/나사 단자; USB; 기타
en: Special effects output interface: 1/4 in trigger; 3.5 mm trigger; DMX (3-pin XLR); DMX (5-pin XLR); Proprietary cable/port; RCA trigger; RJ45 (Art-Net/sACN); Relay contact closure; Terminal block/screw terminals; USB; Other
tr: Özel efekt çıkış arayüzü: 1/4 inç tetikleyici; 3,5 mm tetikleyici; DMX (3 pimli XLR); DMX (5 pimli XLR); Özel kablo/bağlantı noktası; RCA tetikleyici; RJ45 (Art-Net/sACN); Röle kontağı kapatma; Klemens bloğu/vida klemensleri; USB; Diğer
ro-RO: Interfață de ieșire pentru efecte speciale: Declanșator 1/4 in; Declanșator 3,5 mm; DMX (XLR cu 3 pini); DMX (XLR cu 5 pini); Cablu/port proprietar; Declanșator RCA; RJ45 (Art-Net/sACN); Închidere contact releu; Bloc terminal/terminale cu șurub; USB; Altele
es: Interfaz de salida de efectos especiales: Activador de 1/4 pulg.; Activador de 3,5 mm; DMX (XLR de 3 pines); DMX (XLR de 5 pines); Cable/puerto patentado; Activador RCA; RJ45 (Art-Net/sACN); Cierre de contacto de relé; Bloque de terminales/terminales de tornillo; USB; Otro
fr: Interface de sortie des effets spéciaux: Déclencheur 1/4 po; Déclencheur 3,5 mm; DMX (XLR 3 broches); DMX (XLR 5 broches); Câble/port propriétaire; Déclencheur RCA; RJ45 (Art-Net/sACN); Fermeture de contact de relais; Bornier / Bornes à vis; USB; Autre
ru: Интерфейс выходного подключения спецэффектов: Триггер 1/4 дюйма; Триггер 3,5 мм; DMX (3-контактный XLR); DMX (5-контактный XLR); Проприетарный кабель/порт; Триггер RCA; RJ45 (Art-Net/sACN); Замыкание контактов реле; Клеммная колодка / винтовые клеммы; USB; Другое
hu: Speciális effektusok kimeneti interfésze: 1/4 hüvelykes trigger; 3,5 mm-es trigger; DMX (3 tűs XLR); DMX (5 tűs XLR); Saját kábel/port; RCA trigger; RJ45 (Art-Net/sACN); Reléérintkezős záró; Sorkapocs/csavaros csatlakozók; USB; Egyéb
da: Udgangsgrænseflade for special effects: 1/4 tomme udløser; 3,5 mm-udløser; DMX (3-bens XLR); DMX (5-bens XLR); Navnebeskyttet kabel/port; RCA-udløser; RJ45 (Art-Net/sACN); Relækontaktslutning; Klemrække/skrueterminaler; USB; Andet
zh-TW: 特效輸出介面: 1/4 吋觸發端子; 3.5 公釐觸發端子; DMX (3 針 XLR); DMX (5 針 XLR); 專有連接線/連接埠; RCA 觸發端子; RJ45 (Art-Net/sACN); 繼電器接點閉合; 端子台/螺絲端子; USB; 其他
nl: Special effects uitgangsinterface: 1/4 inch-trigger; 3,5 mm-trigger; DMX (3-pins XLR); DMX (5-pins XLR); Eigen kabel/poort; RCA-trigger; RJ45 (Art-Net/sACN); Relaiscontact; Klemmenblok/schroefklemmen; USB; Overige
hr-HR: Izlazno sučelje za specijalne efekte: Pokretač 1/4 in; Pokretač 3,5 mm; DMX (3-pinski XLR); DMX (5-pinski XLR); Vlasnički kabel/priključak; RCA pokretač; RJ45 (Art-Net / sACN); Zatvaranje kontakta releja; Priključni blok / vijčani priključci; USB; Ostalo
pt-BR: Efeitos especiais interface de saída: Acionador de 1/4 pol.; Acionador de 3,5 mm; DMX (XLR de 3 pinos); DMX (XLR de 5 pinos); Cabo/porta de formato proprietário; Acionador RCA; RJ45 (Art-Net/sACN); Fechamento de contato de relé; Bloco de terminais/Terminais de parafuso; USB; Outros
ja: 特殊効果出力インターフェース: 1/4 インチトリガー; 3.5 mm トリガー; DMX (3 ピン XLR); DMX (5 ピン XLR); 専用ケーブル/ポート; RCA トリガー; RJ45 (Art-Net/sACN); リレー接点; 端子台/ネジ式端子; USB; その他
zh-CN: 特效输出接口: 1/4 英寸触发器; 3.5 毫米触发器; DMX（3 针 XLR）; DMX（5 针 XLR）; 专有线缆/端口; RCA 触发器; RJ45 (Art-Net/sACN); 继电器触点闭合; 接线端子排/螺纹端子; USB; 其他
th: อินเทอร์เฟซเอาต์พุตเอฟเฟกต์พิเศษ: ทริกเกอร์ 1/4 นิ้ว; ทริกเกอร์ 3.5 มม.; DMX (XLR 3 พิน); DMX (XLR 5 พิน); สาย/พอร์ตกรรมสิทธิ์; ทริกเกอร์ RCA; RJ45 (Art-Net/sACN); หน้าสัมผัสรีเลย์; เทอร์มินอลบล็อก/เทอร์มินอลแบบขันสกรู; USB; อื่นๆ
vi: Giao diện đầu ra hiệu ứng đặc biệt: Bộ kích hoạt 1/4 in; Bộ kích hoạt 3,5 mm; DMX (XLR 3 chân); DMX (XLR 5 chân); Cáp/cổng độc quyền; Bộ kích hoạt RCA; RJ45 (Art-Net/sACN); Đóng tiếp điểm rơ-le; Khối đấu dây/cọc vít; USB; Khác
nb: Utgangsgrensesnitt for spesialeffekter: 1/4-tommers utløser; 3,5 mm utløser; DMX (3-pinners XLR); DMX (5-pinners XLR); Proprietær kabel/port; RCA-utløser; RJ45 (Art-Net/sACN); Relékontakt; Koblingsklemme/skruterminaler; USB; Annet
cs: Rozhraní pro výstup speciálních efektů: Spoušť 1/4 in; Spoušť 3,5 mm; DMX (3pinový XLR); DMX (5pinový XLR); Proprietární kabel/port; Spoušť RCA; RJ45 (Art-Net/sACN); Reléové sepnutí kontaktů; Svorkovnice / šroubové svorky; USB; Jiné
sl-SI: Izhodni vmesnik za posebne učinke: 1/4-inčni sprožilec; 3,5-milimetrski sprožilec; DMX (3-pinski XLR); DMX (5-pinski XLR); Lastniški kabel/vrata; Sprožilec RCA; RJ45 (Art-Net/sACN); Relejni kontakt; Spončna letev/vijačne sponke; USB; Drugo
bg-BG: Интерфейс за изход със специални ефекти: 1/4 инча тригер; 3,5 mm тригер; DMX (3-пинов XLR); DMX (5-пинов XLR); Собствен кабел/порт; RCA тригер; RJ45 (Art-Net/sACN); Релеен контакт; Клемен блок/винтови клеми; USB; Друго
de: Ausgangsschnittstelle für Spezialeffekte: 1/4-Zoll-Trigger; 3,5-mm-Trigger; DMX (3-Pin XLR); DMX (5-Pin XLR); Proprietäres Kabel/proprietärer Anschluss; Cinch-Trigger; RJ45 (Art-Net/sACN); Relaiskontakt; Klemmenblock/Schraubklemmen; USB; Sonstige
el: Διεπαφή εξόδου ειδικών εφέ: Ενεργοποίηση 1/4 in; Ενεργοποίηση 3,5 mm; DMX (XLR 3 ακίδων); DMX (XLR 5 ακίδων); Ιδιόκτητο καλώδιο/θύρα; Ενεργοποίηση RCA; RJ45 (Art-Net/sACN); Κλείσιμο επαφής ρελέ; Μπλοκ ακροδεκτών/ακροδέκτες με βίδα; USB; Άλλο